Arkansas, session 2025, HB1575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-4-104, concerning the membership of the
Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(h) A person shall not serve as a member of the Arkansas Pollution
Control and Ecology Commission if he or she is employed by a firm, business,
or organization that owns, operates, represents, or applies for a solid waste
license or permit or in which that person has a direct or indirect financial
interest.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-6-703, concerning the creation of
*JMB291*
03-05-2025 10:58:45 JMB291

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 H3/3/25 H3/5/25 HB1575
regional solid waste planning districts and boards, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) A person shall not serve as a member of the board if he or she
is employed by a firm, business, or organization that owns, operates,
represents, or applies for a solid waste license or permit or in which that
person has a direct or indirect financial interest.
(2) Subdivision (d)(1) of this section does not apply to an
elected official or an employee of a city or county that is required to
represent a city or county on a regional solid waste planning district or
board under subsection (b) of this section.


/s/Lundstrum























03-05-2025 10:58:45 JMB291